North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-13.1 North Dakota Commercial Feed Law [Repealed]

19-13.1-01.
Enforcing official. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 18.

19-13.1-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 3; 1987, ch. 263, § 13; 1991, ch. 225, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 219, § 2; 2013, ch. 186, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-03.
Registration and license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 18.

19-13.1-03.1.
Manufacturer’s license — Retailer’s license. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-03.2.
Product registration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-03.3.
License — Registration — Hearing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-03.4.
Pet food — Specialty pet food — Registration — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-04.
Commercial feed — Label — Content. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 5; 1985, ch. 264, § 1; 1987, ch. 268, § 1; 1991, ch. 225, § 4; 2013, ch. 186, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-04.1.
Customer-formula feed — Label — Content. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-05.
Additional labeling requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 225, § 13.

19-13.1-06.
Inspection fee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 7; 1975, ch. 198, § 1; 1983, ch. 254, § 5; 1991, ch. 225, § 5; 1993, ch. 223, § 1; 1995, ch. 219, § 4; 1995, ch. 220, § 2; 2005, ch. 201, § 2; 2013, ch. 186, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-06.1.
Inspection fee — Responsibility for payment — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-06.2.
Inspection fee — Records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-07.
Adulteration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 8; 1991, ch. 225, § 6; 1995, ch. 219, § 5; 2001, ch. 218, § 1; 2013, ch. 186, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-08.
Misbranding. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 9; 1991, ch. 225, § 7; 1995, ch. 219, § 6; 2013, ch. 186, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-09.
Inspection, sampling, analysis. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 10; 1985, ch. 258, § 34; 1987, ch. 263, § 14; 1991, ch. 225, § 8; 1995, ch. 219, § 7; 2013, ch. 186, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-10.
Rules. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 18.

19-13.1-11.
Detained commercial feeds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 12; 1985, ch. 258, § 35; 1987, ch. 263, § 15; 1995, ch. 219, § 9; 2013, ch. 186, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-12.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 13; 1975, ch. 106, § 184; 1985, ch. 258, § 36; 1987, ch. 263, § 16; 1991, ch. 225, § 10; 1993, ch. 218, § 4; 1995, ch. 219, § 10; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2013, ch. 186, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-13.
Publications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 14; 1979, ch. 292, § 1; 1991, ch. 225, § 11; 1995, ch. 219, § 11; 2013, ch. 186, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-14.
Cooperation with other entities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 225, § 12; 1995, ch. 219, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-15.
Certificates — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 186, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-13.1-16.
Deposit of fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 9, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.